Utah statutes.
58-37c-4.   Board.
(1)  There is hereby established a Controlled Substance Precursor Advisory
Board which shall consist of four individuals representing distributors and
purchasers of controlled substance precursors and one member from the general
public.
(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section
58-1-201.
(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with
Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.
